Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.460

Weighmaster's license—Issuance—Expiration date.

The director shall issue a license to an applicant upon his or her satisfaction that the applicant has satisfied the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted hereunder and that such applicant is of good moral character, not less than eighteen years of age, and has the ability to weigh accurately and make correct certified weight tickets. Any license issued under this chapter shall expire annually on a date set by rule by the director. License fees shall be prorated where necessary to accommodate staggering of expiration dates of a license or licenses.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6102; 1991 c 109 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 14; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 292: See note following RCW 26.28.010.